Hawaii statutes.
§281-45 No license issued, when. No
license shall be issued under this chapter:

(1) To any minor or to any person who has been
convicted of a felony and not pardoned, or to any other person not deemed by
the commission to be a fit and proper person to have a license; provided that
the commission may grant a license under this chapter to a corporation that has
been convicted of a felony where the commission finds that the corporation's
officers and shareholders of twenty-five per cent or more of outstanding stock
are fit and proper persons to have a license;

(2) To a corporation the officers and directors of
which, or any of them, would be disqualified under paragraph (1) from obtaining
the license individually, or a stockholder of which, owning or controlling
twenty-five per cent or more of the outstanding capital stock, or to a general
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability company whose partner or member holding twenty-five per cent or more
interest of which, or any of them would be disqualified under paragraph (1)
from obtaining the license individually;

(3) Unless the applicant for a license or a renewal
of a license, or in the case of a transfer of a license, both the transferor
and the transferee, present to the issuing agency a signed certificate from the
director of taxation and from the Internal Revenue Service showing that the
applicant or the transferor and transferee do not owe the state or federal
governments any delinquent taxes, penalties, or interest; or that the
applicant, or in the case of a transfer of a license, the transferor or
transferee, has entered into an installment plan agreement with the department
of taxation and the Internal Revenue Service for the payment of delinquent
taxes in installments and that the applicant is or the transferor or transferee
is, in the case of a transfer of a license, complying with the installment plan
agreement;

(4) To an applicant for a class 2, class 4 except for
convenience minimarts, class 5, class 6, class 11, class 12, class 13, class
14, class 15, class 17, or class 18 license unless the applicant for issuance
of a license or renewal of a license, or in the case of a transfer of a
license, both the transferor and the transferee, present to the issuing agency
proof of liquor liability insurance coverage in an amount of $1,000,000; or

(5) To any applicant who has had any liquor license
revoked less than two years previous to the date of the application for any
like or other license under this chapter. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §26; RL 1935,
§2595; RL 1945, §7247; RL 1955, §159-45; am L 1957, c 293, §1 and c 321, §1(e);
am L 1965, c 121, §1; HRS §281-45; am L 1982, c 65, §1; am L 1985, c 155, §2;
am L 1987, c 223, §2; am L 1990, c 171, §14; am L 1991, c 101, §1; am L 2008, c
168, §9; am L 2009, c 177, §2 and c 184, §8; am L 2010, c 198, §3; am L 2014, c
211, §5]

Cross References

Criminal history record checks, see §846-2.7.

Effect of conviction of a crime, see §831-3.1.

Attorney General Opinions

Taxpayer's agreement to pay its delinquent taxes, pursuant to
a payment schedule, does not satisfy the requirements for liquor license
renewal under this section and §231-28. Att. Gen. Op. 95-1.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next